Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5428YH (4) 91 je/js H.F. 2266 Section 1. Section 10A.202, subsection 2, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The department is responsible for the administration of 3 the laws of this state under chapters 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 90A , 4 91A , 91C , 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and such other labor-services 5 duties assigned to the department or director. 6 Sec. 2. Section 10A.204, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 3. The director, in consultation with the labor 9 commissioner, shall, at the time provided by law, make an 10 annual report to the governor setting forth in appropriate 11 form the business and expense of the division and department 12 under this subchapter for the preceding year, the number 13 of remedial actions taken under chapter 89A , the number of 14 disputes or violations processed by the division or department 15 and the disposition of the disputes or violations, and other 16 matters pertaining to the division or department under this 17 subchapter which that are of public interest, together with 18 recommendations for change or amendment of the laws in this 19 chapter and chapters 88 , 88A , 88B , 89 , 89A , 89B , 90A , 91A , 91C , 20 91D , 91E , 91F, and 92 , and sections 85.67A and 85.68 , and the 21 recommendations, if any, shall be transmitted by the governor 22 to the first general assembly in session after the report is 23 filed. 24 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 91F.1 Definitions. 25 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 26 requires: 27 1. âDirectorâ means the director of the department of 28 inspections, appeals, and licensing. 29 2. âEmployeeâ means the same as defined in the federal 30 Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, as codified in 29 U.S.C. 31 Â§825.102. 32 3. âEmployerâ means the same as defined in the federal 33 Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993, as codified in 29 U.S.C. 34 Â§825.102. 35 -1- LSB 5428YH (4) 91 je/js 1/ 3 H.F. 2266 4. âFamily and Medical Leave Act of 1993â means 29 U.S.C. 1 Â§825.100 et seq., and includes all implementing regulations 2 thereof. 3 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 91F.2 Grandparents ââ family medical 4 leave. 5 1. An employee who is a grandparent shall have the same 6 rights provided to an employee under the federal Family and 7 Medical Leave Act of 1993. An employer of such an employee 8 shall be subject to the same requirements as an employer under 9 the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. 10 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, the rights provided to 11 an employee under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 12 1993 shall be modified as follows for purposes of this chapter. 13 In all other respects, the rights provided under this chapter 14 shall be the same as those provided under the federal Family 15 and Medical Leave Act of 1993. An employee shall be eligible 16 for leave for all of the following: 17 a. For the birth of a grandchild and to care for the newborn 18 child within one year of birth. 19 b. To care for the employeeâs grandchild who has a serious 20 health condition. 21 c. For any qualifying exigency arising out of the fact 22 that the employeeâs grandchild is a covered military member on 23 covered active duty. 24 d. To care for a covered service member with a serious 25 injury or illness if the eligible employee is the service 26 memberâs grandparent. 27 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 91F.3 Enforcement ââ rules. 28 1. The director shall enforce this chapter. This chapter 29 shall be enforced pursuant to chapter 91A. 30 2. The director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 31 17A to administer this chapter. Such rules may establish 32 additional procedures, requirements, and definitions necessary 33 to implement this chapter. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -2- LSB 5428YH (4) 91 je/js 2/ 3 H.F. 2266 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill provides that an employee who is a grandparent 3 shall have the same rights provided to an employee under the 4 federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (the Act). The 5 bill provides that an employer of such an employee shall be 6 subject to the same requirements as an employer under the Act. 7 âEmployeeâ and âemployerâ mean the same as defined in the Act. 8 The bill provides for modification of such rights. The 9 modifications include that an employee is entitled to leave for 10 the birth of a grandchild and to care for the newborn child 11 within one year of birth; to care for the employeeâs grandchild 12 who has a serious health condition; for any qualifying exigency 13 arising out of the fact that the employeeâs grandchild is a 14 covered military member on covered active duty; and to care for 15 a covered service member with a serious injury or illness if 16 the eligible employee is the service memberâs grandparent. 17 The bill is enforced by the director of the department of 18 inspections, appeals, and licensing. The bill is enforced 19 pursuant to Code chapter 91A, which provides for civil remedies 20 and penalties. 21 The bill requires the director to adopt administrative 22 rules to administer the bill, which may establish additional 23 procedures, requirements, and definitions necessary to 24 implement the bill. 25 -3- LSB 5428YH (4) 91 je/js 3/ 3